District of Columbia statutes.
11-1322

Arbitration and conciliation.

In order to effect the speedy settlement of controversies, and with the consent of the parties thereto, the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch may settle cases, irrespective of the amount involved, by the methods of arbitration and conciliation. A judge sitting in the Branch may act as a referee or arbitrator, either alone or in conjunction with other persons, as provided by rule of the court. A judge, officer, or employee of the Superior Court may not accept any fee or compensation in addition to that person’s salary for services performed pursuant to this section.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 490, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(17), 108 Stat. 713
1981 Ed., § 11-1322.
1973 Ed., § 11-1322.